New York, session 2025-2026, A2259.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 420.20 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by 2 chapter 290 of the laws of 1980, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 420.20 Collection of fines, restitution or reparation imposed upon 4 corporations. 5 Where a corporation is sentenced to pay a fine, restitution or repara- 6 tion, the fine, restitution or reparation must be paid at the time 7 sentence is imposed. If the fine, restitution or reparation is not so 8 paid, it may be collected in the same manner as a judgment in a civil 9 action, and if execution issued upon such judgment be returned unsatis- 10 fied an action may be brought in the name of the people of the state of 11 New York to procure a judgment sequestering the property of the corpo- 12 ration, as provided by the business corporation law. It is the duty of 13 the attorney general in all criminal proceedings prosecuted by [him] the 14 attorney general, and, in all other proceedings, the county attorney for 15 counties outside the city of New York, or the town attorney for all 16 proceedings prosecuted by such town attorney for towns contained within 17 Nassau county, and, in the city of New York the corporation counsel of 18 the city of New York, to institute proceedings to collect such fine, 19 restitution or reparation. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05635-01-5